Washington statutes.
RCW 2.06.024

Effective date for Pierce county judicial position—Initial term.

The new judicial position for the second division, district 1, Pierce county, created pursuant to the 1999 amendment to RCW 2.06.020 shall become effective July 1, 2000, and shall be filled by gubernatorial appointment.

The person appointed by the governor shall hold office until the general election to be held in November 2000. At the general election, the judge appointed shall be entitled to run for a term of six years or until the second Monday in January 2007, and until a successor is elected and qualified. Thereafter, the judge shall be elected for a term of six years and until a successor is elected and qualified, commencing with the second Monday in January succeeding the election.

[ 1999 c 75 s 2.]